Maryland, session 2026, SB0234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0234*

SENATE BILL 234
Article – Business Regulation
5–805.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Abandoned cemetery” means a cemetery for which:
(i) 1. the organization established to engage in the operation of
the cemetery has been terminated, has been subject to administrative dissolution by the
State, or has otherwise ceased to exist; and
2. title has not been conveyed;
(ii) there is no property owner listed in the records of the State
Department of Assessments and Taxation;
(iii) the property has been condemned; or
(iv) no person who is legally responsible for the property can be found
and legal ownership of the property cannot be determined.
5–806.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ABANDONED CEMETERY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–805
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) “CULTURAL AFFILIATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–121
OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(4) “DESCENDANT COMMUNITY ORGANIZATION” MEANS AN
ORGANIZATION WHOSE MEMBERS HAVE ANCESTORS WHO ARE INTERRED IN A
PARTICULAR CEMETERY OR WHO HAVE A CULTURAL AFFILIATION OR A RACIAL OR
ETHNIC AFFINITY WITH THE DECEASED PERSONS INTERRED IN A PARTICULAR
CEMETERY.
(B) (1) A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT MAY, BY CONDEMNATION, ACQUIRE
PROPERTY ON WHICH AN ABANDONED CEMETERY IS LOCATED WITH THE INTENT TO
TRANSFER THE PROPERTY TO:
(I) THE DESCENDANTS OF THE DECEASED PERSONS INTERRED
IN THE CEMETERY;

SENATE BILL 234 3
(II) A DESCENDANT COMMUNITY ORGANIZATION; OR
(III) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION.
(2) A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT USING CONDEMNATION PROCEEDINGS
TO ACQUIRE PROPERTY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
CONDUCT THE CONDEMNATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH MARYLAND RULE 12–204.
(C) (1) A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT THAT ACQUIRES PROPERTY ON WHICH
AN ABANDONED CEMETERY IS LOCATED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL MAKE TIMELY AND REASONABLE EFFORTS AFTER ACQUISITION TO CONTACT
DESCENDANTS OF THE DECEASED PERSONS INTERRED IN THE ABANDONED
CEMETERY IN ORDER TO IDENTIFY DESCENDANTS, A DESCENDANT COMMUNITY
ORGANIZATION, OR A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION TO WHICH THE PROPERTY MAY BE
TRANSFERRED.
(2) A PERSON OR ORGANIZATION LISTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1)
OF THIS SECTION MAY BRING AN ACTION REQUESTING THE COURT TO TRANSFER
PROPERTY ACQUIRED BY A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT UNDER THIS SECTION TO THE
PERSON OR ORGANIZATION.
(D) ANY DESCENDANT, DESCENDANT COMMUNITY ORGANIZATION, OR
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT ACQUIRES PROPERTY UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL MAINTAIN AND PRESERVE THE ABANDONED CEMETERY ON
THE PROPERTY.
(E) IF A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT THAT ACQUIRES PROPERTY UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IS UNABLE TO TRANSFER THE PROPERTY TO A
PERSON DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION WITHIN A
REASONABLE PERIOD OF TIME, THE GOVERNMENTAL UNIT:
(1) SHALL MAINTAIN AND PRESERVE THE ABANDONED CEMETERY
LOCATED ON THE PROPERTY; AND
(2) MAY FACILITATE THE REINTERMENT OF ANY HUMAN REMAINS OR
PET REMAINS FROM THE CEMETERY ON THE PROPERTY TO AN OPERATIONAL
CEMETERY.
Article – Real Property
14–121.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.

SENATE BILL 234
(3) “Cultural affiliation” means a relationship of shared group identity that
can be reasonably traced historically between a present–day group, tribe, band, or clan and
an identifiable earlier group.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.